District of Columbia statutes.
32-301

Purpose.

(a)

The purpose of this chapter is to further the policy of the District of Columbia to encourage and assist blind individuals and individuals with other severe disabilities to achieve maximum personal independence through useful and productive gainful employment by assuring an expanded and constant market for products and services for blind individuals and individuals with other severe disabilities thereby enhancing their dignity and capacity for self-support.

(b)

Further, it is the purpose of this chapter to create employment opportunities for blind individuals and individuals with other severe disabilities which enhance training, evaluation, adjustment and open market employment for those persons who become sufficiently capable.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-128, § 2, 25 DCR 2236
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 45(a), 53 DCR 6198
1981 Ed., § 36-601.
1973 Ed., § 36-801.
D.C. Law 16-305 substituted “individuals and individuals with other severe disabilities” for “and other severely handicapped individuals” and “products and services for blind individuals and individuals for with other severe disabilities” for “blind and other severely handicapped products and services”.